Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-242
Department of Correctional Services; convey described property.

The Department of Correctional Services is authorized by the Legislature to convey to the county of Lancaster, Nebraska, a permanent easement for slope work and bridge maintenance on certain real estate legally described as follows: The west seventeen feet of the fifty feet of the south sixty feet of the north four hundred thirty-one and nine-tenths feet of the north half of the southeast quarter of section 10, township 9 north, range 6 east of the sixth principal meridian, Lancaster County, Nebraska.

Laws 1985, LB 265, § 1.